New Jersey, session 221, A2597.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission shall not charge any additional fee for any service provided by the commission through the commissions website that is not charged for the same service when that service is provided at a commission agency or regional service center. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.